Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3
JOB ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM

30-17-301 to 30-17-306. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part repealed, p. 1871, § 24, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 1986. For amendments to this part 3 prior to its repeal in 1991, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.